Massachusetts, session 194th, H2058.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 147 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
following new section:- 
Section 64. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
“Law enforcement agency of the commonwealth”, any state, municipal, college or 
university police department, sheriff’s department, correctional facility, prosecutorial office, 
court, probation office, or a program of more than one of any such entity, or any other non-
federal entity in the commonwealth charged with the enforcement of laws or the custody of 
detained persons.  
“Detainer request”, a written request issued by the United States Immigration and 
Customs Enforcement agency, or any subdivision or bureau thereof, duly issued to any law 
enforcement agency of the commonwealth and directing said agency to provide notification 

of 3 13 before releasing an individual from custody, or to maintain custody of the individual for a period 
not to exceed 48 hours beyond the time the individual otherwise would be released, or both. 
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no law enforcement 
agency of the commonwealth shall establish a policy or directive ordering its officers and 
employees to fail or refuse to comply with detainer requests pertaining to individuals within the 
custody of such agency, and no officer or employee of a law enforcement agency of the 
commonwealth, while acting under color of law, shall knowingly fail or refuse to comply with 
the terms of any detainer request pertaining to any individual within the custody of said agency. 
(c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a law enforcement agency 
of the commonwealth in receipt of a detainer request pertaining to an individual within its 
custody shall notify the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement agency of any 
planned release or change in the custody status of said individual not less than 24 hours in 
advance of such planned release or change. 
SECTION 2. All state and local officials with law enforcement responsibilities shall 
receive training on the requirements of this act within six months of its passage, including 
training on the legal basis for detainer requests and the procedural steps for compliance. 
SECTION 3. Every law enforcement agency of the commonwealth shall provide a report 
to the secretary of the executive office of public safety and security on or before the fifteenth day 
of January of each year detailing the number of detainer requests received by such agency during 
the preceding calendar year, together with an explanation of how many of said detainer requests 
were honored or not honored, and with an explanation for the reasons for any non-compliance, 
including but not limited to any policy or directive of the agency to dishonor or refuse to comply 

of 3 35 with such requests; provided, that no such report shall contain any personally-identifiable 
information concerning any individual subject to a detainer request. The secretary shall collect 
such information and submit a consolidated report as to the data for each individual law 
enforcement agency of the commonwealth to the Clerks of the House of Representatives and the 
Senate on or before the fifteenth day of February of each year.